California statutes. Public Resources Code
Notwithstanding any other law, a commission agreement entered into for purposes of the Long-Duration Energy Storage Program shall not require the review, consent, or approval of the Department of General Services or any other state department or agency and are not required to comply with the requirements of the State Contracting Manual, the Public Contract Code, or the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 61, Sec. 5.   (AB 205)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25645.

(a) In providing financial incentives pursuant to this chapter, the commission shall give preference to an eligible project that does one or more of the following:

(1) Increases the reliability and resiliency of the electrical grid.

(2) Adds electrical grid services when the electrical grid is stressed or anticipating pending energy challenges.

(3) Increases the use of renewable energy, through reducing curtailment and shifting power usage from peak to off-peak times, and reduces the impact of climate change on the electrical grid or on connected facilities or
 communities, including by improving air quality, reducing emissions of greenhouse gases, or providing under-resourced communities with increased reliability and resiliency.

(4) Lowers energy costs and provides employment opportunities for residents of under-resourced communities.

(5) Interconnects to the electrical grid and is commercially operational by 2028.

(b) For applications received after January 1, 2027, the commission shall provide
 financial incentives to a project that involves the performance of work by contractors in the construction industry only if that work is performed pursuant to a project labor agreement that, at a minimum, meets the requirements of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 395, Sec. 5.   (AB 1280)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.5. Agricultural Industry Energy Program [25650. - 25650.]

25650.

(a) All funds from loan repayments and interest that become due and payable for loans made by the commission pursuant to an agriculture energy assistance program shall be deposited in the Energy Technologies Research, Development, and Demonstration Account, and shall be available for loans and technical assistance pursuant to this section, upon appropriation in the Budget Act. Up to 20 percent of the annual appropriation may be available for technical assistance.

(b) Loans made pursuant to this section shall be for the purchase of equipment and services for agriculture energy efficiency and development demonstration projects, including, but not limited to, production of methane or ethanol, use of wind, photovoltaics, and other sources of energy for irrigation pumping, application of load management conservation techniques, improvements in water pumping and pressurization techniques, and conservation tillage techniques.

(c) The loans shall contain terms that provide for a repayment period of not more than seven years and for interest at a rate that is not less than 2 percent below the rate earned by moneys in the Pooled Money Investment Account.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1046, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.6. Clean Energy Programs [25660. - 25666.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [25660. - 25661.5.]

25660.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Clean energy programs” means the programs described in Section 25660.4.

(b) “Emergency Load Reduction Program” means the Emergency Load Reduction Program established by the Public Utilities Commission in Decision 21-03-056 (March 25, 2021), Decision Directing Pacific Gas and Electric Company, Southern California Edison Company, and San Diego Gas and Electric Company to Take Actions to Prepare for Potential Extreme Weather in the Summers of 2021 and 2022.

(c) “Financial incentive” includes a contract, grant, loan, rebate, block grant, or other appropriate funding
 mechanism.

(d) “Under-resourced community” has the same meaning as defined in Section 71130.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 12.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25660.2.

On or before March 1 , 2024, and annually thereafter by that date until all funds appropriated for purposes of this chapter have been encumbered, the commission shall publish on its internet website and report, as applicable, to the budget and relevant policy committees of the Legislature all of the following for each clean energy program:

(a) The amount of moneys expended for the program and balance of moneys remaining to be spent, including geographic distribution of those moneys.

(b) The amount of moneys expended on administrative, technical, or scientific services for the program.

(c) Quantitative estimates and qualitative
 information on how moneys expended by the program are achieving the specific purposes of that program.

(d) Estimates of additional electrical generation or storage capacity at net peak hours or during critical grid conditions created, expanded, or otherwise made available as a direct result of the program.

(e) Estimated onsite reductions of the emissions of greenhouse gases and criteria air pollutants that occurred as a direct result of the program.

(f) A description of how the appropriated moneys were used for the program and industries receiving program funding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 12.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25660.4.

This chapter only applies to the following programs or activities:

(a) The Industrial Grid Support and Decarbonization Program established pursuant to Section 25662.

(b) The Food Production Investment Program established pursuant to Section 25663.

(c) The Hydrogen Program established pursuant to Section 25664.2.

(d) The Equitable Building Decarbonization Program established pursuant to Section 25665.1.

(e) The program to support offshore wind infrastructure improvements established pursuant to Section
 25666.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 12.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25661.

In implementing the clean energy programs, the commission may do both of the following:

(a) Contract for or use an interagency agreement to obtain technical, scientific, outreach, and administrative services. Administrative services may include, but are not limited to, providing outreach to eligible industries, identifying promising technologies, assessing market conditions needed to accelerate commercial traction of the technology, assisting with technical review of proposals and deliverables, identifying opportunities that provide significant benefits to the electrical grid, and performing benefits analysis. No more than 15 percent of the moneys appropriated for each program may be used for technical, scientific, outreach, or administrative services.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, in its discretion, advance up to 25 percent of the clean energy program moneys allocated pursuant to this chapter to recipients of a financial incentive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 12.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25661.5.

Of the moneys appropriated for the clean energy programs, the Climate Innovation Program established pursuant to Section 25625.2, the Carbon Removal Innovation Program established pursuant to Section 25688, and the Long-Duration Energy Storage Program established pursuant to Section 25641, the commission may use up to a total of twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) for projects consistent with subdivision (f) of Section 63048.93 of the Government Code. The commission, in its sole discretion, shall determine how to allocate those moneys for those programs. The commission may transfer moneys, if necessary, from the source fund of the appropriation to the Climate Catalyst Revolving Fund created pursuant to Section 63048.95 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 20, Sec. 39.   (AB 137)   Effective June 30, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Industrial Decarbonization and Improvement of Grid Operations Program [25662. - 25662.6.]

25662.

The commission shall establish and administer the Industrial Decarbonization and Improvement of Grid Operations Program to provide financial incentives for the implementation of eligible projects at eligible industrial facilities to provide significant benefits to the electrical grid, reduce emissions of greenhouse gases and health-harming pollutants, achieve the state’s clean energy goals, and exceed compliance requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 395, Sec. 7.   (AB 1280)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

25662.2.

(a) The commission may establish project and industrial facility eligibility guidelines for purposes of this article.

(b) The eligibility guidelines established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be consistent with all of the following requirements:

(1) “Eligible industrial facility” shall include, but not be limited to, a facility involved with manufacturing, production, and processing of materials, such as chemicals, metals, food and beverages, and nonmetallic minerals, including cement, glass, electronics, and pharmaceuticals, and related support facilities.

(2) (A) “Eligible project” shall include, but not be limited to, the purchase and deployment of advanced technologies and equipment that is capable of doing at least one of the following:

(i) Enhance electrical grid reliability and enable industrial facility participation in utility load reduction programs, such as an emergency load reduction program.

(ii) Electrify processes that use gas or other fossil fuels to produce heat for industrial processes.

(iii) Incorporate energy storage, including thermal energy storage, or renewable energy resources.

(iv) Increase energy efficiency.

(v) Develop and deploy novel decarbonization technologies and strategies, including carbon capture of process emissions for use in products, such as carbonate mineralization and carbon curing of concrete that reduces or eliminates the emissions of greenhouse gases, except geologic storage.

(B) “Eligible project” shall not include a project to benefit an oil production, processing, or refining facility, to benefit a fossil gas production, processing, or refining facility, or to use captured carbon for enhanced oil and gas recovery.

(C) For applications received after January 1,
 2027, a project that involves the performance of work by contractors in the construction industry shall be eligible for a financial incentive pursuant to this article only if the work is performed pursuant to a project labor agreement that, at a minimum, meets the requirements of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(D) A project shall only be eligible for a financial incentive pursuant to this article if the project will use technologies that exceed the best available control technology, as defined in Section 40405 of the Health and Safety Code, if applicable.

(E) For applications received after January 1,
 2027, an eligible project for a facility that has a record of air permit violations shall separately develop a plan for pollution remediation, including for ecological and public health harms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 395, Sec. 8.   (AB 1280)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

25662.4.

(a) In providing financial incentives pursuant to this article, the commission shall give preference to an eligible project that does one or more of the following:

(1) Provides significant benefits to the electrical grid, especially during net peak periods.

(2) Maximizes the reduction of the emissions of greenhouse gases.

(3) Reduces air pollution in under-resourced communities.

(4) Is located in an under-resourced community, as defined in Section 71130, or in an area out of compliance with the applicable
 federal Clean Air Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 7401 et seq.) deadlines in
 nonattainment areas.

(5) Develops a community benefit fund or agrees to pursue a community benefits agreement with the surrounding community and other affected stakeholders.

(b) In providing financial incentives pursuant to this article, the commission shall prioritize an eligible project that reduces demand during net peak periods.

(c) (1) The commission shall consult with the State Air Resources Board to ensure that financial incentives provided pursuant to this article reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases under the statewide greenhouse gas emission limits in furtherance of the state’s greenhouse gas reduction targets, to the extent feasible under the State Air Resources
 Board’s regulatory programs.

(2) To comply with the requirements of this subdivision, the commission may require a recipient of a financial incentive to surrender to the State Air Resources Board the number of annual allowances allocated at no cost to the eligible industrial facility pursuant to the market-based compliance mechanism developed pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 38570) of Division 25.5 of the Health and Safety Code equivalent to the greenhouse gas emissions reduced by the eligible project.

(d) A recipient of a financial incentive pursuant to this article shall not receive more than 20 percent of the moneys allocated pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 395, Sec. 9.   (AB 1280)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

25662.6.

An eligible project that receives a financial incentive pursuant to this article is ineligible for a financial incentive pursuant to the Food Production Investment Program (Article 3 (commencing with Section 25663)).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 12.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Food Production Investment Program [25663. - 25663.6.]

25663.

The commission shall establish and administer the Food Production Investment Program to provide financial incentives for the implementation of eligible projects to accelerate the adoption of advanced energy technologies and other decarbonization technologies at eligible facilities to support electrical grid reliability and reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases from those eligible facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 12.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25663.2.

(a) The commission may establish project and facility eligibility guidelines for purposes of this article.

(b) The eligibility guidelines established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be consistent with both of the following requirements:

(1) “Eligible facility” shall include, but not be limited to, a facility that is directly involved in food production and processing, and related support facilities.

(2) “Eligible project” shall include, but not be limited to, both of the following:

(A) The purchase and deployment of advanced technologies and
 equipment that exceed the best available control technologies, as defined in Section 40405 of the Health and Safety Code, if applicable.

(B) A project that does at least one of the following:

(i) Enhances electrical grid reliability and enables an eligible facility to participate in a utility load reduction program, such as an emergency load reduction program.

(ii) Electrifies processes that use gas or other fossil fuels.

(iii) Incorporates photovoltaics, energy storage, or other renewable energy sources.

(iv) Increases energy efficiency.

(v) Develops and deploys novel decarbonization technologies and strategies, except
 carbon capture or utilization technologies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 12.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25663.4.

(a) In providing financial incentives pursuant to this article, the commission shall give preference to an eligible project that does one or more of the following:

(1) Provides significant benefits to the electrical grid, especially during net peak periods.

(2) Maximizes the reduction of the emissions of greenhouse gases.

(3) Reduces air pollution in under-resourced communities.

(b) In providing financial incentives pursuant to this article, the commission shall prioritize an eligible project that reduces demand during net peak periods.

(c) (1) The commission shall consult with the State Air Resources Board to ensure that financial incentives provided pursuant to this article reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases under the statewide greenhouse gas emission limits in furtherance of the state’s greenhouse gas reduction targets, to the extent feasible under the State Air Resources Board’s regulatory programs.

(2) To comply with the requirements of this subdivision, the commission may require a recipient of a financial incentive to surrender to the State Air Resources Board the number of annual allowances allocated at no cost to the facility pursuant to the market-based compliance mechanism developed pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 38570) of Division 25.5 of the Health and Safety Code equivalent to the greenhouse gas emissions reduced by the project.

(d) A recipient of a financial incentive pursuant to this article shall not receive more than 20 percent of the moneys allocated pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 12.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25663.6.

An eligible project that receives a financial incentive pursuant to this article is ineligible for a financial incentive pursuant to the Industrial Grid Support and Decarbonization Program (Article 2 (commencing with Section 25662)).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 12.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Hydrogen Program [25664. - 25664.1.]

25664.

For purposes of this article, hydrogen projects that produce, process, deliver, store, or use hydrogen derived from water using eligible renewable energy resources, as defined in Section 399.12 of the Public Utilities Code, or produced from these eligible renewable energy resources, shall be eligible for financial incentives pursuant to this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 12.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25664.1.

(a) The commission shall establish and administer the Hydrogen Program pursuant to this article to provide financial incentives to eligible in-state hydrogen projects for the demonstration or scale-up of the production, processing, delivery, storage, or end use of hydrogen consistent with Section 25664.1.

(b) Financial incentives provided pursuant to this article may be used as matching funds by selected entities that have received a grant pursuant to Section 16161 of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(c) The commission may establish project eligibility and other guidelines for purposes of this article.

(d) The commission shall include in the guidelines or project requirements that the financial incentives received pursuant to this article do not supplant or result in duplicative offset credits, renewable energy credits, or other forms of compliance credits.

(e) The commission shall only provide financial incentives to eligible projects that help reduce sector-wide emissions, as determined by the commission.

(f) The commission shall prioritize eligible projects that benefit geographically diverse areas of the state.

(g) The commission shall prioritize eligible projects that maximize air quality, equity, health, and workforce benefits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 12.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Equitable Building Decarbonization Program [25665. - 25665.7.]

25665.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “California Native American tribe” has the same meaning as defined in Section 21073.

(b) “California tribal organization” means a corporation, association, or group controlled, sanctioned, or chartered by a California Native American tribe that is subject to its laws, the laws of the State of California, or the laws of the United States.

(c) “Direct install” means an energy efficiency, decarbonization, or load flexible solution provided directly to a consumer at minimal or no cost through a third-party implementer.

(d) “Low-carbon building technology” means a technology that reduces a building’s direct emissions of greenhouse gases.

(e) “Low-to-moderate income” has the same meaning as “persons and families of low or moderate income” as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) “Residential dwelling” means any of the following:

(1) A multifamily residential building of at least two housing units.

(2) An individual or single-family residence.

(3) A mobilehome unit.

(g) “Statewide incentive program” means a first come, first served incentive program for specified equipment serving the residents of
 California.

(h) “Third-party implementer” means noncommission personnel under contract to the commission who propose, design, implement, or deliver Equitable Building Decarbonization Program activities.

(i) “Under-resourced community” has the same meaning as defined in Section 71130.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 12.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25665.1.

(a) (1) The commission shall establish the Equitable Building Decarbonization Program.

(2) The Equitable Building Decarbonization Program includes the direct install program established pursuant to Section 25665.3 and the statewide incentive program for low-carbon building technologies established pursuant to section 25665.5.

(b) If moneys made available for the Equitable Building Decarbonization Program remain unspent after two years, the commission shall evaluate potential changes to the Equitable Building Decarbonization Program to increase participation and may make those unspent funds, or a portion of those unspent funds, available for other
 purposes consistent with the Equitable Building Decarbonization Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 12.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25665.3.

The commission shall establish the direct install program consistent with all of the following:

(a) Participation in the direct install program shall be at minimal or no cost for low-to-moderate income residents, with preference given where the building meets one or more of the following criteria:

(1) The building is located in a under-resourced community.

(2) The building is owned or managed by a California Native American tribe or a California tribal organization.

(3) The building is owned by a member of a California Native American tribe.

(b) The commission may administer the direct install program through regional direct install third-party implementers selected through a competitive solicitation process. In selecting third-party implementers, the commission shall prioritize applications from entities that include at least one community-based organization in order to ensure for the provision of culturally-appropriate outreach, education, and support to households participating in the direct install program, and from entities that employ workers from local communities.

(c) The direct install program shall reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases, and shall encourage, where feasible, resiliency to extreme heat, indoor air quality improvements, energy affordability, and grid reliability support.

(d) Projects eligible to be funded through the direct install
 program include installation of energy efficient electric appliances, energy efficiency measures, demand flexibility measures, wiring and panel upgrades, building infrastructure upgrades, efficient air conditioning systems, ceiling fans, and other measures to protect against extreme heat, where appropriate, and remediation and safety measures to facilitate the installation of new technologies.

(e) The direct install program may include tenant protections for participating rental properties. These protections may include requiring the consent of tenants impacted by the work, tenant education provided by community-based organizations, protections against short-term and long-term displacement, and limits on increases in rent after completion of a project funded pursuant to the direct install program.

(f) Projects funded pursuant the direct install program shall be performed by
 workers paid prevailing wage where possible and when applicable.

(g) The commission may establish project and eligibility guidelines for purposes of the direct install program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 12.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25665.5.

The commission shall establish and administer a statewide incentive program for low-carbon building technologies, consistent with all of the following:

(a) The commission shall coordinate with other program administrators, such as the Public Utilities Commission, the Department of Community Services and Development, and the Strategic Growth Council, and may integrate with or enhance other incentive programs.

(b) The commission shall establish eligibility requirements for the statewide incentive program for low-carbon building technologies.

(c) Measures eligible for funding pursuant to the statewide incentive program for low-carbon
 building technologies include, but are not limited to, low-carbon building technologies, such as heat pumps, space and water heaters, and other efficient electric technologies.

(d) A minimum of 50 percent of the moneys allocated pursuant to the statewide incentive program for low-carbon building technologies shall benefit residents living in an under-resourced community.

(e) The guidelines for the statewide incentive program for low-carbon building technologies may be developed with input from stakeholders, including, but not limited to, residential dwelling owners, manufacturers, building contractors, utilities, and other agencies through public workshops.

(f) The commission may establish guidelines for purposes of the statewide incentive program for low-carbon building technologies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 12.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25665.6.

The commission may adopt guidelines or other standards at a commission business meeting to implement this article. The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to the adoption of the guidelines or other standards adopted by the commission to implement this article. Before adopting or revising the guidelines or other standards, the commission shall provide an opportunity for public comment and at least one public workshop.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 12.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25665.7.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before September 1, 2024, and annually thereafter until all moneys appropriated in Items 3360-002-0001 and 3360-102-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2022, as amended by Chapter 249 of the Statutes of 2022, for the Equitable Building Decarbonization Program have been expended, the commission shall submit a report to the relevant policy committees of the Legislature that includes information about the progress of the direct install program, including the selected administrators and implementers and implementation progress, including, but not limited to, the number of residents and buildings provided low- and zero-cost projects, the number of each project type implemented, the estimated reductions of the emissions of greenhouse
 gases, and the locational distribution of the expenditures by county and region.

(b) (1) Upon the complete expenditure of all moneys described in subdivision (a), the commission shall notify the Secretary of State contemporaneously with the submission of the report required by subdivision (a) that includes information regarding the last expended moneys.

(2) This section shall become inoperative on the date the commission notifies the Secretary of State pursuant to paragraph (1) and is repealed on January 1 of the following year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 387, Sec. 1.   (SB 306)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Conditionally inoperative as prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Program to Support Offshore Wind Infrastructure Improvements [25666. - 25666.]

25666.

(a) The commission shall establish and administer a program to support offshore wind infrastructure improvements in order to advance the capabilities of California ports, harbors, and other waterfront facilities to support the buildout of offshore wind facilities and maximize the economic and environmental benefits of an offshore wind industry in California.

(b) The commission may develop guidelines for purposes of this article. Eligible applicants shall include California port authorities, port operators, port commissions, and their respective authorized agents, other California waterfront facilities, and other entities that demonstrate a commitment to California offshore wind energy investments and are partnered with a California
 waterfront facility.

(c) Moneys allocated pursuant to this article may be used for any of the following purposes:

(1) Category I activities. Category I activities support developing individual or regional retrofit concepts and investment plans. Category I activities may include planning, feasibility analysis, business case development, environmental analyses, engineering and design work, and other offshore wind energy related planning and development activities.

(2) Category II activities. Category II activities support final design, engineering, environmental studies and review, and construction of retrofits. Category II activities may support a range of retrofit activities to support deployment of offshore wind energy, including land expansion for component assembly, staging, and transportation, facility updates
 such as adding laydown and storage areas, increasing heavy-lift crane weight and height capabilities, and other improvements to support the long-term operation and maintenance of offshore wind generation facilities, and other offshore wind energy related design and development activities.

(3) Providing cost share funding to an eligible applicant that receives a federal award for purposes consistent with Category I or Category II activities. Moneys allocated pursuant to this paragraph shall be known as Category III funds.

(4) Preliminary engineering and environmental review work, including taking actions and preparing material to comply with the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000)) or federal environmental laws.

(d) Moneys allocated pursuant to this article may be used for
 one or more purposes described in subdivision (c), to the extent it is consistent with the commission’s guidelines and the scope of the allocation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 12.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7.8. Carbon Removal Innovation Program [25685. - 25689.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions and Definitions [25685. - 25686.]

25685.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the Carbon Removal Innovation Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 13.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25686.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Eligible projects” means projects that include, but are not limited to, technology research, development, and demonstrations and implementation of prototype and pilot research test centers.

(b) “Financial incentive” includes a contract, grant, loan, or other appropriate funding mechanism.

(c) “Program” means the Carbon Removal Innovation Program established pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 25688).

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 13.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Program Establishment and Implementation [25688. - 25689.]

25688.

(a) The commission shall establish and administer the Carbon Removal Innovation Program to provide financial incentives for eligible projects that advance technologies for direct air capture of atmospheric carbon.

(b) Eligible projects shall include, but not be limited to, technology research, development and demonstrations, and prototype and pilot research test centers to remove atmospheric carbon. Eligible projects shall not include a project to benefit a petroleum or gas production, processing, or refining facility, through enhanced oil or gas recovery.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 13.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

25689.

In implementing the program, the commission may do all of the following:

(a) In addition to any other authorized method of providing moneys to participants, use financial incentives.

(b) Adopt guidelines or other standards at a commission business meeting for the program, including guidelines to ensure that the program improves emission reductions and environmental performance of existing facilities and does not adversely impact local air quality.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, noncompetitively award program moneys to an entity that will use the moneys as matching funds for federally awarded moneys.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, advance up to 25 percent at a time of the program moneys awarded pursuant to this chapter to the awardee.

(e) Consult with the State Air Resources Board, State Water Resources Control Board, Department of Fish and Wildlife, State Lands Commission, local air quality management districts and local air pollution control districts, regional water quality control boards, and other relevant local, state, or federal agencies, to ensure program moneys support achieving the state’s climate targets, to the extent feasible.

(f) On or before January 1, 2026, the commission shall publish on its internet website, at a minimum, the following information regarding the projects for which the commission awards program funds:

(1) A detailed
 description of the project, including how the project meets the goals and objectives established by the commission.

(2) A detailed update regarding the status of the construction, development, permitting, and operation of the project.

(3) If feasible, based on available data, an analysis of the effectiveness of the project, and the project’s impact on criteria pollutants in the community in which the project is located or near.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 251, Sec. 13.   (AB 209)   Effective September 6, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Energy Shortage Contingency Planning [25700. - 25705.]

25700.

The commission shall, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, develop contingency plans to deal with possible shortages of electrical energy or fuel supplies to protect public health, safety, and welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25701.

(a) Within six months after the effective date of this division, each electric utility, gas utility, and fuel wholesaler or manufacturer in the state shall prepare and submit to the commission a proposed emergency load curtailment plan or emergency energy supply distribution plan setting forth proposals for identifying priority loads or users in the event of a sudden and serious shortage of fuels or interruption in the generation of electricity.

(b) The commission shall encourage electric utilities to cooperate in joint preparation of an emergency load curtailment plan or emergency energy distribution plan. If such a cooperative plan is developed between two or more electric
 utilities, such utilities may submit such joint plans to the commission in place of individual plans required by subdivision (a) of this section.

(c) The commission shall collect from all relevant governmental agencies, including, but not limited to, the Public Utilities Commission and the Office of Emergency Services, any existing contingency plans for dealing with sudden energy shortages or information related thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 484.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

25702.

The commission shall, after one or more public hearings, review the emergency load curtailment program plans or emergency energy supply distribution plans submitted pursuant to Section 25701, and, within one year after the effective date of this division, the commission shall approve and recommend to the Governor and the Legislature plans for emergency load curtailment and energy supply distribution in the event of a sudden energy shortage. Such plans shall be based upon the plans presented by the electric utilities, gas utilities, and fuel wholesalers or manufacturers, information provided by other governmental agencies, independent analysis and study by the commission and information provided at the hearing or hearings. Such plans shall provide for the provision of essential services, the protection of public health, safety, and welfare, and the maintenance of a sound basic state economy. Provision shall be made in such plans to eliminate wasteful, uneconomic, and unnecessary uses of energy in times of shortages and to differentiate curtailment of energy consumption by users on the basis of ability to accommodate such curtailments. Such plans shall also specify the authority of and recommend the appropriate actions of state and local governmental agencies in dealing with energy shortages.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25703.

Within four months after the date of certification of any new facility, the commission shall review and revise the recommended plans based on additional new capacity attributed to any such facility. The commission shall, after one or more public hearings, review the plans at least every five years from the approval of the initial plan as specified in Section 25702.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 276.)
-------------------------------------------

25704.
